Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB915.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5501 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5501. Riot.(a) Participation.--A person is guilty of riot, a felony of the third degree, if he participates with two or more others in a course of disorderly conduct:(1) with intent to commit or facilitate the commission of a felony or misdemeanor;(2) with intent to prevent or coerce official action; or(3) when the actor or any other participant to the knowledge of the actor uses or plans to use a firearm or other deadly weapon.(b) Organization of riot.--123456789101112131415161718 (1) A person that knowingly organizes, controls or finances a riot with two or more people is guilty of a felony of the third degree.(2) If a person commits an offense under paragraph (1) and the offense leads to the death of an individual, the person is guilty of a felony of the first degree.(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Controls." The action of knowingly directing, coordinating or supervising the offense of rioting for two or more people."Finances." Contributing more than a de minimis amount of money or materials to aid in a riot with two or more people."Organizes." The action of knowingly arranging or planning the crime of rioting for two or more people.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0915PN1091 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718